District of Columbia statutes.
32-806

Variations from rules or regulations; public hearing.

The Board may, upon written application of any employer affected by such rule or regulation, permit variations from any provisions thereof if it shall find that the application of such provision would result in unnecessary hardship or practical difficulty, and notwithstanding such variance, that the protection afforded by such rule or regulation will be provided. The Board may grant a hearing open to the public on such application upon request of the applicant or other interested party or parties, or on its own initiative. The Board’s decision thereon shall be subject to review by the District of Columbia Court of Appeals upon petition of the applicant or other affected party or parties. The Board shall keep a properly indexed record of all variations permitted from any rule or regulation, which shall be open to public inspection.

Sept. 19, 1918, ch. 174, title II, § 6
Oct. 14, 1941, 55 Stat. 738, ch. 438,§ 3
Jan. 5, 1971, 84 Stat. 1936, Pub. L. 91-650, title V, § 501(3)

History

1981 Ed., § 36-226.
1973 Ed., § 36-436.

Prior Codifications

Repeal of chapter: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 32-801.

Editor's Notes